de: Steinobstsorte: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Plattpfirsich (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Andere
fr: Cultivar de fruit à noyau: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Pêche plate (Saturne); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Autre
zh-TW: 核果栽培品種: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; 蟠桃 (Donut/Saturn Peach); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; 其他
bg-BG: Сорт костилкови плодове: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Праскова тип поничка (Сатурн); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Друго
nl: Steenfruit cultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Platte (wilde) perzik; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Overig
zh-CN: 核果栽培品种: 北极金 (Arctic Gold); 加州红 (Cal Red); 蟠桃; Flamecrest; 金皇后 (Golden Queen); Honey Blaze; 奥亨利 (O'Henry); 红港 (Red Haven); 雪王 (Snow King); 白丽 (White Lady); 其他
it: Cultivar della frutta a nocciolo: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Pesca tabacchiera (Saturnia); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O’Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Altro
da: Stenfrugtkultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut/Saturn (fersken); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Andet
lt-LT: Kaulavaisių veislė: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Kita
pt-PT: Cultivar de fruto de caroço: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Pêssego donut (Saturno); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Outro
vi: Giống cây ăn quả hạch: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Đào dẹt (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Khác
en: Stone fruit cultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut (Saturn) Peach; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Other
cs: Odrůda peckovin: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Zploštělá broskev; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Jiné
pt-BR: Fruta de caroço cultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Pêssego Donut (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Outro
ko: 핵과류 품종: 아크틱 골드; 칼 레드; 도넛(새턴) 복숭아; 플레임크레스트; 골든 퀸; 허니 블레이즈; 오헨리; 레드 헤이븐; 스노우 킹; 화이트 레이디; 기타
sl-SI: Kultivar koščičastega sadja: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Breskev Donut (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Drugo
ja: 核果類栽培品種: アークティックゴールド; カルレッド; ドーナツ (サターン) ピーチ; フレームクレスト; ゴールデンクイーン; ハニーブレイズ; オーヘンリー; レッドヘブン; スノーキング; ホワイトレディ; その他
sv: Stenfruktskultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Platt persika (Saturnus); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Övrigt
nb: Steinfruktkultivar: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut-fersken (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Annet
fi: Kivihedelmälajike: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut (Saturn) -persikka; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Muu
tr: Taş meyve çeşidi: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Basık (Satürn) şeftali; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Diğer
el: Καλλιεργητική ποικιλία πυρηνόκαρπων: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Ροδάκινο πλακέ (Donut/Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Άλλο
ru: Сорт косточкового фрукта: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Инжирный персик (Сатурн); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Другое
ro-RO: Soi de drupe: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Piersică plată (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Altele
es: Cultivar de fruta de carozo: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Durazno chato (Saturno); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Otro
sk-SK: Kultivar kôstkového ovocia: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Broskyňa Donut (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Iné
th: พันธุ์ไม้ผลมีเมล็ดแข็ง: อาร์กติกโกลด์; แคลเรด; พีชทรงโดนัท (พีชทรงแบน); เฟลมเครส; โกลเด้นควีน; ฮันนี่เบลซ; โอเฮนรี; เรดเฮเวน; สโนว์คิง; ไวท์เลดี้; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Sorta koštuničavog voća: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Donut (Saturn) Peach; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Ostalo
pl: Kultywar owocu pestkowego: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Brzoskwinia Ufo (Saturn); Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Inne
hu: Csonthéjas gyümölcs kultivárja: Arctic Gold; Cal Red; Lapos (Saturn) barack; Flamecrest; Golden Queen; Honey Blaze; O'Henry; Red Haven; Snow King; White Lady; Egyéb